Hawaii statutes.
§11-21 Change of name, transfer on election
day. (a) The county clerk may designate a registration clerk, who may be
an election official, at any of the polling places in the county on the day of
the election.

(b) These registration clerks shall take
applications for change of name from voters who have been married or who have
had their names changed since the last election.

(c) Any person whose name appears on the
registered voters list whose residence has changed since the last election, and
whom the county clerk has not transferred under section 11-20, may apply on a
form prescribed by the chief elections officer at the person's new polling
place on the day of the election for transfer of registration to the precinct
of the new residence. Any person so transferring voter registration shall be
immediately added to the register of the new precinct and may vote only at the
new precinct.

(d) Where a person was incorrectly placed on a
list of voters of a precinct in which the person does not actually reside, the
person may correct the registration.

(e) No person shall be prevented from voting
at the election in the precinct in which the person's name appears on the
voters list due to a change of name, or other correction made under this
section. However, any voter registered in the wrong precinct who shall refuse
to make the correction of registration may be challenged in accordance with
section 11-25.

(f) Any person changing name or transferring
shall receive a copy of the change or transfer form. [L 1970, c 26, pt of §2;
am L 1972, c 77, §3; am L 1984, c 64, §2; am L 1985, c 203, §2; am L 1987, c
273, §4; am L 1992, c 129, §§3, 4]

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next